District of Columbia statutes.
2-703

Marking requirements for envelopes.

Envelopes or other materials which are used to enclose official mail shall bear upon its facing, in addition to the name and address of the agency mailing the official mail, the words “official business.”

Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-118, § 4, 23 DCR 8746
This section is referenced in § 2-704.
1981 Ed., § 1-1703.
1973 Ed., § 1-1703.